Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 18.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4841
Immunity.

(a) A person that acts with reasonable
care in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act or with the
applicable anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith
to do so, is not liable for the act in a civil action, criminal prosecution,
or administrative proceeding.

(b)
Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor's estate is liable
for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the gift.

(c)
In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or revoked
under the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, a person may rely upon representations
of an individual listed in subdivision (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or
(9) of section 71-4832 relating to the individual's relationship to the donor
or prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 18.